Utah statutes.
26-6-17.   Venereal disease -- Examinations by authorities -- Treatment of infected persons.

State, county, and municipal health officers within their respective jurisdictions may make examinations of persons reasonably suspected of being infected with venereal disease. Persons infected with venereal disease shall be required to report for treatment to either a reputable physician and continue treatment until cured or to submit to treatment provided at public expense until cured.

